Utah statutes.
32B-8-203.   Specific qualifications for resort license.

(1)  For purposes of this chapter, the commission shall apply:

(a)  Subsection 32B-1-304(1)(a) to a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, only if an individual listed in Subsection 32B-1-304(1)(b) will engage in the management of the resort; and

(b)  Subsection 32B-1-304(1)(c) to an individual who is employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for the resort licensee or in relation to a sublicense.

(2)  The following are subject to Section 32B-8-501:

(a)  an action of the commission under Subsection 32B-1-304(2);

(b)  an action of the director under Subsection 32B-1-304(3); and

(c)  termination of a resort license under Subsection 32B-1-304(6).

(3) (a)  A person employed to act in a supervisory or managerial capacity for a sublicense is subject to the qualification requirements in the provisions applicable to the sublicense.

(b)  If a person described under Subsection (3)(a) no longer possesses the qualifications required by this Subsection (3), the commission may suspend or revoke the sublicense that is part of the resort license.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

